test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-3lex_eemeed_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - eemeed: # MLO, checked; short / half long
    eemeed+N+Sg+Nom: eemeed
    eemeed+N+Sg+Gen: eemeed
    eemeed+N+Sg+Acc: eemeed
    eemeed+N+Sg+Ill: [emedân, emedân]
    eemeed+N+Sg+Loc: [emedist, emedist]
    eemeed+N+Sg+Com: [emedáin, emedáin]
    eemeed+N+Sg+Abe: eemeedttáá
    eemeed+N+Ess: [emedin, emedin]
    eemeed+N+Par: [emedid, emedid]
    eemeed+N+Pl+Nom: [emedeh, emedeh]
    eemeed+N+Pl+Gen: [emedij, emedij]
    eemeed+N+Pl+Acc: [emedijd, emedijd]
    eemeed+N+Pl+Ill: [emedáid, emedáid]
    eemeed+N+Pl+Loc: [emedijn, emedijn]
    eemeed+N+Pl+Com: [emedijguin, emedijguin]
    eemeed+N+Pl+Abe: [emedijttáá, emedijttáá]

  Noun - iiđeed: # MLO, checked; short / half long
    iiđeed+N+Sg+Nom: iiđeed
    iiđeed+N+Sg+Gen: iiđeed
    iiđeed+N+Sg+Acc: iiđeed
    iiđeed+N+Sg+Ill: [iđedân, iđedân]
    iiđeed+N+Sg+Loc: [iđedist, iđedist]
    iiđeed+N+Sg+Com: [iđedáin, iđedáin]
    iiđeed+N+Sg+Abe: iiđeedttáá
    iiđeed+N+Ess: [iđedin, iđedin]
    iiđeed+N+Par: [iđedid, iđedid]
    iiđeed+N+Pl+Nom: [iđedeh, iđedeh]
    iiđeed+N+Pl+Gen: [iđedij, iđedij]
    iiđeed+N+Pl+Acc: [iđedijd, iđedijd]
    iiđeed+N+Pl+Ill: [iđedáid, iđedáid]
    iiđeed+N+Pl+Loc: [iđedijn, iđedijn]
    iiđeed+N+Pl+Com: [iđedijguin, iđedijguin]
    iiđeed+N+Pl+Abe: [iđedijttáá, iđedijttáá]

  Noun - raameeg: # MLO, checked; short / half long
    raameeg+N+Sg+Nom: raameeg
    raameeg+N+Sg+Gen: raameeg
    raameeg+N+Sg+Acc: raameeg
    raameeg+N+Sg+Ill: [ramegân, ramegân]
    raameeg+N+Sg+Loc: [ramegist, ramegist]
    raameeg+N+Sg+Com: [ramegáin, ramegáin]
    raameeg+N+Sg+Abe: raameegttáá
    raameeg+N+Ess: [ramegin, ramegin]
    raameeg+N+Par: [ramegid, ramegid]
    raameeg+N+Pl+Nom: [ramegeh, ramegeh]
    raameeg+N+Pl+Gen: [ramegij, ramegij]
    raameeg+N+Pl+Acc: [ramegijd, ramegijd]
    raameeg+N+Pl+Ill: [ramegáid, ramegáid]
    raameeg+N+Pl+Loc: [ramegijn, ramegijn]
    raameeg+N+Pl+Com: [ramegijguin, ramegijguin]
    raameeg+N+Pl+Abe: [ramegijttáá, ramegijttáá]

  Noun - puureeh: # MLO, checked; short / half long
    puureeh+N+Sg+Nom: puureeh
    puureeh+N+Sg+Gen: puureeh
    puureeh+N+Sg+Acc: puureeh
    puureeh+N+Sg+Ill: [purehân, purehân]
    puureeh+N+Sg+Loc: [purehist, purehist]
    puureeh+N+Sg+Com: [pureháin, pureháin]
    puureeh+N+Sg+Abe: puureehttáá
    puureeh+N+Ess: [purehin, purehin]
    puureeh+N+Par: [purehid, purehid]
    puureeh+N+Pl+Nom: [pureheh, pureheh]
    puureeh+N+Pl+Gen: [purehij, purehij]
    puureeh+N+Pl+Acc: [purehijd, purehijd]
    puureeh+N+Pl+Ill: [pureháid, pureháid]
    puureeh+N+Pl+Loc: [purehijn, purehijn]
    puureeh+N+Pl+Com: [purehijguin, purehijguin]
    puureeh+N+Pl+Abe: [purehijttáá, purehijttáá]

  Noun - kiiruurg: # MLO, checked; my mother knows only the short form
    kiiruurg+N+Sg+Nom: kiiruurg
    kiiruurg+N+Sg+Gen: kiiruurg
    kiiruurg+N+Sg+Acc: kiiruurg
    kiiruurg+N+Sg+Ill: kirurgân
    kiiruurg+N+Sg+Loc: kirurgist
    kiiruurg+N+Sg+Com: kirurgáin
    kiiruurg+N+Sg+Abe: kiiruurgttáá
    kiiruurg+N+Ess: kirurgin
    kiiruurg+N+Par: kirurgid
    kiiruurg+N+Pl+Nom: kirurgeh
    kiiruurg+N+Pl+Gen: kirurgij
    kiiruurg+N+Pl+Acc: kirurgijd
    kiiruurg+N+Pl+Ill: kirurgáid
    kiiruurg+N+Pl+Loc: kirurgijn
    kiiruurg+N+Pl+Com: kirurgijguin
    kiiruurg+N+Pl+Abe: kirurgijttáá

  Noun - vookaal: # MLO, checked; short / half long
    vookaal+N+Sg+Nom: vookaal
    vookaal+N+Sg+Gen: vookaal
    vookaal+N+Sg+Acc: vookaal
    vookaal+N+Sg+Ill: [vokalân, vokalân]
    vookaal+N+Sg+Loc: [vokalist, vokalist]
    vookaal+N+Sg+Com: [vokaláin, vokaláin]
    vookaal+N+Sg+Abe: vookaalttáá
    vookaal+N+Ess: [vokalin, vokalin]
    vookaal+N+Par: [vokalid, vokalid]
    vookaal+N+Pl+Nom: [vokaleh, vokaleh]
    vookaal+N+Pl+Gen: [vokalij, vokalij]
    vookaal+N+Pl+Acc: [vokalijd, vokalijd]
    vookaal+N+Pl+Ill: [vokaláid, vokaláid]
    vookaal+N+Pl+Loc: [vokalijn, vokalijn]
    vookaal+N+Pl+Com: [vokalijguin, vokalijguin]
    vookaal+N+Pl+Abe: [vokalijttáá, vokalijttáá]

  Noun - kaanaal: # MLO, checked; short / half long
    kaanaal+N+Sg+Nom: kaanaal
    kaanaal+N+Sg+Gen: kaanaal
    kaanaal+N+Sg+Acc: kaanaal
    kaanaal+N+Sg+Ill: [kanalân, kanalân]
    kaanaal+N+Sg+Loc: [kanalist, kanalist]
    kaanaal+N+Sg+Com: [kanaláin, kanaláin]
    kaanaal+N+Sg+Abe: kaanaalttáá
    kaanaal+N+Ess: [kanalin, kanalin]
    kaanaal+N+Par: [kanalin, kanalid]
    kaanaal+N+Pl+Nom: kanaleh
    kaanaal+N+Pl+Gen: kanalij
    kaanaal+N+Pl+Acc: kanalijd
    kaanaal+N+Pl+Ill: kanaláid
    kaanaal+N+Pl+Loc: kanalijn
    kaanaal+N+Pl+Com: kanalijguin
    kaanaal+N+Pl+Abe: kanalijttáá

  Noun - juuriist: # MLO, checked; only short form
    juuriist+N+Sg+Nom: juuriist
    juuriist+N+Sg+Gen: juuriist
    juuriist+N+Sg+Acc: juuriist
    juuriist+N+Sg+Ill: juristân
    juuriist+N+Sg+Loc: juristist
    juuriist+N+Sg+Com: juristáin
    juuriist+N+Sg+Abe: juuriisttáá
    juuriist+N+Ess: juristin
    juuriist+N+Par: juristid
    juuriist+N+Pl+Nom: juristeh
    juuriist+N+Pl+Gen: juristij
    juuriist+N+Pl+Acc: juristijd
    juuriist+N+Pl+Ill: juristáid
    juuriist+N+Pl+Loc: juristijn
    juuriist+N+Pl+Com: juristijguin
    juuriist+N+Pl+Abe: juristijttáá


  Noun - jiereeh: # MLO, checked; only short form
    jiereeh+N+Sg+Nom: jiereeh
    jiereeh+N+Sg+Gen: jiereeh
    jiereeh+N+Sg+Acc: jiereeh
    jiereeh+N+Sg+Ill: jierehân
    jiereeh+N+Sg+Loc: jierehist
    jiereeh+N+Sg+Com: jiereháin
    jiereeh+N+Sg+Abe: jiereehttáá
    jiereeh+N+Ess: jierehin
    jiereeh+N+Par: jierehid
    jiereeh+N+Pl+Nom: jiereheh
    jiereeh+N+Pl+Gen: jierehij
    jiereeh+N+Pl+Acc: jierehijd
    jiereeh+N+Pl+Ill: jiereháid
    jiereeh+N+Pl+Loc: jierehijn
    jiereeh+N+Pl+Com: jierehijguin
    jiereeh+N+Pl+Abe: jierehijttáá
 
  Noun - čuáđáád: # MLO, ok; only short form; is this really a noun?
    čuáđáád+N+Sg+Nom: čuáđáád
    čuáđáád+N+Sg+Gen: čuáđáád
    čuáđáád+N+Sg+Acc: čuáđáád
    čuáđáád+N+Sg+Ill: čuáđádân
    čuáđáád+N+Sg+Loc: čuáđádist
    čuáđáád+N+Sg+Com: čuáđádáin
    čuáđáád+N+Sg+Abe: čuáđáádttáá
    čuáđáád+N+Ess: čuáđádin
    čuáđáád+N+Par: čuáđádid
    čuáđáád+N+Pl+Nom: čuáđádeh
    čuáđáád+N+Pl+Gen: čuáđádij
    čuáđáád+N+Pl+Acc: čuáđádijd
    čuáđáád+N+Pl+Ill: čuáđádáid
    čuáđáád+N+Pl+Loc: čuáđádijn
    čuáđáád+N+Pl+Com: čuáđádijguin
    čuáđáád+N+Pl+Abe: čuáđádijttáá

  Noun - iäláán: # MLO, ok; ođđa sátni  1B
    iäláán+N+Sg+Nom: iäláán
    iäláán+N+Sg+Gen: iäláán
    iäláán+N+Sg+Acc: iäláán
    iäláán+N+Sg+Ill: iälánân
    iäláán+N+Sg+Loc: iälánist
    iäláán+N+Sg+Com: iälánáin
    iäláán+N+Sg+Abe: iäláánttáá
    iäláán+N+Ess:    iälánin
    iäláán+N+Par:    iälánid
    iäláán+N+Pl+Nom: iäláneh
    iäláán+N+Pl+Gen: iälánij
    iäláán+N+Pl+Acc: iälánijd
    iäláán+N+Pl+Ill: iälánáid
    iäláán+N+Pl+Loc: iälánijn
    iäláán+N+Pl+Com: iälánijguin
    iäláán+N+Pl+Abe: iälánijttáá

  Noun - saalaat: # MLO, ok Matti Morottaja sujâttem mield; nubbe vyehi: POTTAAK
    saalaat+v2+N+Sg+Nom: saalaat
    saalaat+v2+N+Sg+Gen: saalaat
    saalaat+v2+N+Sg+Acc: saalaat
    saalaat+v2+N+Sg+Ill: salatân
    saalaat+v2+N+Sg+Loc: salatist
    saalaat+v2+N+Sg+Com: salatáin
    saalaat+v2+N+Sg+Abe: saalaattáá
    saalaat+v2+N+Ess: salatin
    saalaat+v2+N+Par: salatid
    saalaat+v2+N+Pl+Nom: salateh
    saalaat+v2+N+Pl+Gen: salatij
    saalaat+v2+N+Pl+Acc: salatijd
    saalaat+v2+N+Pl+Ill: salatáid
    saalaat+v2+N+Pl+Loc: salatijn
    saalaat+v2+N+Pl+Com: salatijguin
    saalaat+v2+N+Pl+Abe: salatijttáá

  Noun - toomaat: # MLO, ok Matti Morottaja sujâttem mield; nubbe vyehi POTTAAK
    toomaat+v2+N+Sg+Nom: toomaat
    toomaat+v2+N+Sg+Gen: toomaat
    toomaat+v2+N+Sg+Acc: toomaat
    toomaat+v2+N+Sg+Ill: [tomatân, tomatân]
    toomaat+v2+N+Sg+Loc: [tomatist, tomatist]
    toomaat+v2+N+Sg+Com: [tomatáin, tomatáin]
    toomaat+v2+N+Sg+Abe: toomaattáá
    toomaat+v2+N+Ess: [tomatin, tomatin]
    toomaat+v2+N+Par: [tomatid, tomatid]
    toomaat+v2+N+Pl+Nom: [tomateh, tomateh]
    toomaat+v2+N+Pl+Gen: [tomatij, tomatij]
    toomaat+v2+N+Pl+Acc: [tomatijd, tomatijd]
    toomaat+v2+N+Pl+Ill: [tomatáid, tomatáid]
    toomaat+v2+N+Pl+Loc: [tomatijn, tomatijn]
    toomaat+v2+N+Pl+Com: [tomatijguin, tomatijguin]
    toomaat+v2+N+Pl+Abe: [tomatijttáá, tomatijttáá]
    
  Noun - rooboot: # MLO, ok Matti Morottaja sujâttem mield; nubbe vyehi LITTER
    rooboot+v2+N+Sg+Nom: rooboot
    rooboot+v2+N+Sg+Gen: rooboot
    rooboot+v2+N+Sg+Acc: rooboot
    rooboot+v2+N+Sg+Ill: [robotân, robotân]
    rooboot+v2+N+Sg+Loc: [robotist, robotist]
    rooboot+v2+N+Sg+Com: [robotáin, robotáin]
    rooboot+v2+N+Sg+Abe: rooboottáá
    rooboot+v2+N+Ess: [robotin, robotin]
    rooboot+v2+N+Par: [robotid, robotid]
    rooboot+v2+N+Pl+Nom: [roboteh, roboteh]
    rooboot+v2+N+Pl+Gen: [robotij, robotij]
    rooboot+v2+N+Pl+Acc: [robotijd, robotijd]
    rooboot+v2+N+Pl+Ill: [robotáid, robotáid]
    rooboot+v2+N+Pl+Loc: [robotijn, robotijn]
    rooboot+v2+N+Pl+Com: [robotijguin, robotijguin]
    rooboot+v2+N+Pl+Abe: [robotijttáá, robotijttáá]
    
  Noun - ruávást: # MLO, checked 1B d-k,  v-v
    ruávást+N+Sg+Nom: ruávást
    ruávást+N+Sg+Gen: ruávást
    ruávást+N+Sg+Acc: ruávást
    ruávást+N+Sg+Ill: ruávástân
    ruávást+N+Sg+Loc: ruávástist
    ruávást+N+Sg+Com: ruávástáin
    ruávást+N+Sg+Abe: ruávásttáá
    ruávást+N+Ess: ruávástin
    ruávást+N+Par: ruávástid
    ruávást+N+Pl+Nom: ruávásteh
    ruávást+N+Pl+Gen: ruávástij
    ruávást+N+Pl+Acc: ruávástijd
    ruávást+N+Pl+Ill: ruávástáid
    ruávást+N+Pl+Loc: ruávástijn
    ruávást+N+Pl+Com: ruávástijguin
    ruávást+N+Pl+Abe: ruávástijttáá

  Noun - siilak: # MLO ok; only short form  1B d-k,  v-v
    siilak+N+Sg+Nom: siilak
    siilak+N+Sg+Gen: siilak
    siilak+N+Sg+Acc: siilak
    siilak+N+Sg+Ill: silakân
    siilak+N+Sg+Loc: silakist
    siilak+N+Sg+Com: silakáin
    siilak+N+Sg+Abe: siilakttáá
    siilak+N+Ess: silakin
    siilak+N+Par: silakid
    siilak+N+Pl+Nom: silakeh
    siilak+N+Pl+Gen: silakij
    siilak+N+Pl+Acc: silakijd
    siilak+N+Pl+Ill: silakáid
    siilak+N+Pl+Loc: silakijn
    siilak+N+Pl+Com: silakijguin
    siilak+N+Pl+Abe: silakijttáá
    
  Noun - kappeer: # MLO, ok
    kappeer+N+Sg+Nom: kappeer
    kappeer+N+Sg+Gen: kappeer
    kappeer+N+Sg+Acc: kappeer 
    kappeer+N+Sg+Ill: [kaperân, kaperân]
    kappeer+N+Sg+Loc: [kaperist, kaperist] 
    kappeer+N+Sg+Com: [kaperáin, kaperáin]
    kappeer+N+Ess: [kaperin, kaperin]
    kappeer+N+Par: [kaperid, kaperid]
    kappeer+N+Pl+Nom: [kapereh, kapereh]
    kappeer+N+Pl+Gen: [kaperij, kaperij]
    kappeer+N+Pl+Acc: [kaperijd, kaperijd]
    kappeer+N+Pl+Ill: [kaperáid, kaperáid]
    kappeer+N+Pl+Loc: [kaperijn, kaperijn]
    kappeer+N+Pl+Com: [kaperijttáá, kaperijguin]
    kappeer+N+Pl+Abe: [kaperijttáá, kaperijttáá]

  Noun - immeel: # MLO, ok 1B g-v, CCVV > CV
    immeel+N+Sg+Nom: immeel
    immeel+N+Sg+Gen: immeel
    immeel+N+Sg+Acc: immeel
    immeel+N+Sg+Ill: [imelân, imelân]
    immeel+N+Sg+Loc: [imelist, imelist]
    immeel+N+Sg+Com: [imeláin, imeláin]
    immeel+N+Sg+Abe: immeelttáá
    immeel+N+Ess: [imelin, imelin]
    immeel+N+Par: [imelid, imelid]
    immeel+N+Pl+Nom: [imeleh, imeleh]
    immeel+N+Pl+Gen: [imelij, imelij]
    immeel+N+Pl+Acc: [imelijd, imelijd]
    immeel+N+Pl+Ill: [imeláid, imeláid]
    immeel+N+Pl+Loc: [imelijn, imelijn]
    immeel+N+Pl+Com: [imelijguin, imelijguin]
    immeel+N+Pl+Abe: [imelijttáá, imelijttáá]
